Washington statutes.
RCW 37.04.040

Previous cessions of jurisdiction saved.

Sections 8108 and 8109, Remington's Revised Statutes [1891 pp 31, 32 §§ 1, 2], and all other acts and parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter are hereby repealed: PROVIDED, That jurisdiction heretofore ceded to the United States over any land within this state by any previous act of the legislature shall continue according to the terms of the respective cessions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if jurisdiction so ceded by any previous act of the legislature has not been affirmatively accepted by the United States, or if the United States has failed or ceased to use any such land for the purposes for which acquired, jurisdiction thereover shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1939 c 126 s 4; RRS s 8108-4.]